District of Columbia statutes.
29-705.03

Sharing of distributions.

A distribution by a limited partnership shall be shared among the partners on the basis of the value, as stated in the required records when the limited partnership decides to make the distribution, of the contributions the limited partnership has received from each partner.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-705.08.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 503 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).